Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202279-2803
Purple star school; annual designation; qualifications.

(1) The State Board of Education may annually designate any school as a purple star school if such school applies for such designation in the manner prescribed by the board and meets the qualifications in subsection (2) of this section.

(2) To qualify as a purple star school, a school shall:

(a) Designate a staff member as a military liaison, whose duties shall include, but not be limited to:

(i) Identifying military-connected students enrolled in the school;

(ii) Serving as a point of contact in the school for military-connected students and their families;

(iii) Determining the appropriate school services available to military-connected students; and

(iv) Assisting in the coordination of school programs relevant to military-connected students;

(b) Maintain an easily accessible web page on the school's website that includes resources for military-connected students and their families, including information regarding:

(i) Relocation to, enrollment at, registration at, and transferring records to the school;

(ii) Academic planning, course sequences, and advanced classes available at the school;

(iii) Counseling and other support services available for military-connected students enrolled at the school; and

(iv) Contact information for the military liaison designated under subdivision (2)(a) of this section and the duties of the military liaison under such subdivision;

(c) Maintain a transition program led by students, where appropriate, that assists military-connected students in transitioning into the school;

(d) Offer professional development for staff members on issues related to military-connected students; and

(e) Do at least one of the following:

(i) Post a resolution showing support for military-connected students and their families on the school's website;

(ii) Recognize April as the Military Child Month or November as Military Family Month with relevant events hosted by the school; or

(iii) Partner with a local military installation that provides opportunities for active duty military members to volunteer at the school, speak at an assembly, or host field trips for students.

(3) A public school may partner with its school district to comply with requirements under subdivision (2)(b), (d), or (e) of this section.

Laws 2021, LB5, § 3.